Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Funds.

Sec. 23.20.130.
Unemployment compensation fund; training and building fund; establishment and control.

There shall be maintained, as special funds separate and apart from all public funds of this state, an unemployment compensation fund, which shall be administered by the department exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, and a training and building fund.

The unemployment compensation fund consists of

all contributions collected under this chapter;

interest earned on money in the unemployment trust fund account;

property or securities acquired through the use of money belonging to the fund;

earnings of the property or securities;

sums made available to the state as advances under 42 U.S.C. 1321 — 1324 (Title XII, Social Security Act), as amended, for the purposes of paying benefits as provided in this chapter;

advances from the general fund of the state for the purposes of paying benefits provided in this chapter;

all money credited to this state’s account in the unemployment trust fund under 42 U.S.C. 1103 (§ 903, Social Security Act), as amended;

all money received for the fund from any other source;

reimbursement of benefits paid under AS

23.20.277

and

23.20.278

; and

recovery of benefits paid from the unemployment compensation fund to individuals not entitled to them as provided by AS

23.20.390

.

All money in the unemployment compensation fund is mingled and undivided.

The training and building fund consists of all interest and penalties collected under AS

23.20.185

,

23.20.190

, and

23.20.195

and all sums recovered on official bond for losses sustained by the fund. Training and building fund money shall be deposited in the clearing account of the unemployment compensation fund for clearance only and does not become a part of the fund. The unobligated amount in the training and building fund in excess of $100,000 on the close of business of the 30th day following the last day of each fiscal year shall be transferred within 20 days to this state’s account in the unemployment trust fund. The fund shall be included in the budget submitted to the legislature under AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act). Funds available in the training and building fund shall be expended upon the direction of the department, with the approval of the governor, when it appears to the governor that the expenditure is necessary for but not limited to

the proper administration of this chapter if no federal funds are available for the specific purpose for which the expenditure is to be made, and if the funds are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds that would be made available in the absence of those funds;

the proper administration of this chapter, if appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet received, and the training and building fund will be reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation;

[Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

the purposes specified in AS

23.20.075

.

History.

(§ 401 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 13 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 23.20.135.
Accounts and deposit.

The commissioner of revenue is ex officio the treasurer and custodian of the fund and shall administer it as directed by the department. Disbursements shall be issued from the fund in accordance with AS

37.25.050

and the regulations that the department adopts. The fund has three separate accounts:

a clearing account;

an unemployment trust fund account; and

a benefit account.

The department, or a designee of the department, shall immediately deposit, upon receipt, all money payable to the fund in the clearing account. Refunds of contributions erroneously collected and payable under AS

23.20.225

and

23.20.526(a)(11)

may be paid from the clearing account in the same manner, or from the training and building fund. Interest and penalty payments may not be refunded from the unemployment compensation fund. After clearance, all money in the clearing account, except for that portion of employee contributions under AS

23.20.290(d)

used to pay interest on advances received under AS

23.20.140

, shall be immediately deposited with the United States Secretary of the Treasury to the credit of the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund established and maintained under 42 U.S.C. 1104 (§ 904, Social Security Act), as amended.

The benefit account consists of money requisitioned from this state’s account in the unemployment trust fund for the purpose of paying benefits. Money in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited by the designee of the department, under the direction of the department, in a bank or public depository in which general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium may be paid out of the fund. Money in these accounts may not be commingled with other state funds, but shall be maintained in separate accounts on the books of the depository bank. The money is secured by the depository law of this state. Collateral pledged for this purpose shall be kept separate and distinct from collateral pledged to secure other funds of the state. The commissioner of revenue is liable on the official bond of the commissioner for the faithful performance of the commissioner’s duties in connection with the fund. Sums recovered for losses sustained by the fund shall be deposited in the fund.

History.

(§ 402 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 14 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1987; am § 11 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2006, in subsection (a), substituted “Disbursements shall be issued from” for “Checks or warrants shall be issued on,” inserted “AS

37.25.050

and,” and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 23.20.140.
Advances.

When, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1321 — 1324 (Title XII, Social Security Act), as amended, the balance in the unemployment trust fund reaches a point where the governor must apply for an advance in order to obtain for the state and its citizens the advantages available under 42 U.S.C. 1321 — 1324, the department shall notify the governor and take other action which is appropriate to obtain an advance to the unemployment trust fund and arrange for its repayment in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1321 — 1324.

History.

(§ 403 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1987)

Sec. 23.20.145.
Withdrawals.

In accordance with regulations adopted by the department, money shall be requisitioned from the state’s account in the unemployment trust fund solely for the payment of benefits and refunds, except that money credited to the state’s account under 42 U.S.C. 1103 (§ 903, Social Security Act), as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in (f) — (h) of this section.

The department shall from time to time requisition from the unemployment trust fund amounts not exceeding the amounts standing to the state’s account in the fund that it considers necessary for the payment of benefits for a reasonable future period. Upon receipt of an amount the department shall deposit the money to the benefit account. A payment may be made solely from the benefit account.

If money in the clearing account is not sufficient to provide for refunds of contributions erroneously collected and payable under AS

23.20.225

and

23.20.526(a)(11)

, the department shall withdraw from the unemployment trust fund the amounts not exceeding the amount standing to this state’s account in the fund that are necessary for the payment of the refunds, but no amounts may be withdrawn from the unemployment trust fund for the refund of interest and penalty payments. Upon receipt, the department, or the designee of the department, shall deposit this money to the clearing account. A payment of a refund shall be made from the clearing account.

Expenditures of the money in the benefit account and refunds from the clearing account are not subject to provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their custody.

A balance of money requisitioned from the unemployment trust fund which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the expiration of the period for which the sums were requisitioned shall be deducted from estimates for and may be used for the payment of benefits during succeeding periods, or, in the discretion of the department, shall be redeposited with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States to the credit of this state’s account in the unemployment trust fund, as provided in AS

23.20.135

.

Money credited to the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States under 42 U.S.C. 1103 (§ 903, Social Security Act) may not be requisitioned from this state’s account or used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter. This money may be requisitioned under (b) of this section for the payment of benefits. This money may also be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter but only under a specific appropriation by the legislature and only if the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law that

specifies the purpose for which the money is appropriated and the amount appropriated;

limits the period within which the money may be obligated to a period ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment of the appropriation law; and

limits the amount that may be obligated during a fiscal year to an amount that does not exceed the amount by which the aggregate of the amounts credited to the account of this state under 42 U.S.C. 1103 (Sec. 903, Social Security Act) during that fiscal year and the 34 preceding fiscal years exceeds the aggregate of the amounts obligated for administration and paid out for benefits and charged against the amounts credited to the account of this state during those 35 fiscal years.

Amounts credited to this state’s account in the unemployment trust fund under 42 U.S.C. 1103 (Sec. 903, Social Security Act) that are obligated for administration or paid out for benefits shall be charged against equivalent amounts that were first credited and that are not already so charged. However, an amount obligated for administration during a fiscal year specified in this section may not be charged against any amount credited during a fiscal year earlier than the 34th preceding fiscal year.

Money appropriated under this section for the payment of expenses of administration shall be requisitioned as needed for the payment of obligations incurred under that appropriation and, upon requisition, shall be deposited in the employment security administration fund from which the payments shall be made. Money so deposited shall, until expended, remain a part of the unemployment fund and, if it will not be expended, shall be returned promptly to the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund.

History.

(§ 404 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 15 ch 169 SLA 1957; am §§ 2, 3 ch 123 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 106 SLA 1969; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A pay order drawn on the unemployment benefit account for the payment of unemployment benefits must bear the signature of the commissioner of administration since it would be a warrant within the meaning of subsection (d) of this section.
July 13, 1966, Op. Att’y Gen. (decided prior to 2004 amendment).

The commissioner does not have to sign with his own hand each check or warrant issued against the benefit account; his signature may be printed on the appropriate check or warrant as it is now in the case of benefit checks.
July 13, 1966, Op. Att’y Gen. (decided prior to 2004 amendment).

It is permissible to affix the signature of the commissioner of administration to the pay order card by means of a rubber validation stamp that would be used by the claims examiner at the time he countersigns for the commissioner of labor and issues the pay order card.
July 13, 1966, Op. Att’y Gen. (decided prior to 2004 amendment).

For procedure for authorizing use of commissioner’s signature on pay order cards, see July 13, 1966, Op. Att’y Gen. (decided prior to 2004 amendment).

Sec. 23.20.150.
Discontinuance of unemployment trust fund.

To the extent that AS

23.20.130

—

23.20.140

relate to the unemployment trust fund, they are operative only so long as the unemployment trust fund exists and so long as the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America maintains for the state a separate book account of all funds deposited in it by this state for benefit purposes, together with the state’s proportionate share of the earnings of the unemployment trust fund, from which no other state may make withdrawals.

If the unemployment trust fund ceases to exist, or a separate book account is no longer maintained, all money, property, or security in the fund which belongs to the unemployment compensation fund of the state shall be transferred to the treasurer of the unemployment compensation fund, who shall hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and release the money, property, or security in a manner approved by the department in accordance with this chapter. However, the money shall be invested in bonds or other interest-bearing obligations of the United States and the investments shall be made so that all the assets of the fund are readily convertible into cash when needed for the payment of benefits. The treasurer may dispose of securities or other property belonging to the unemployment compensation fund only under the direction of the department.

History.

(§ 405 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.155.
Employment security administration fund.

There is created a special fund in the state treasury known as the employment security administration fund.

All money deposited into this fund shall be continuously available to the department for expenditure in accordance with this chapter, and may not lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund. All money in this fund, except money received under AS

23.20.145(h)

, which is received from the federal government or which is appropriated by the state for the purpose described in AS

23.20.100

shall be expended solely for the purpose and in the amount found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for administration of this chapter.

The fund consists of all money appropriated by this state; all money received from the federal government; all money received from another source for that purpose; money received from an agency of the United States or another state as compensation for services or facilities supplied to such agency; amounts received under a surety bond or insurance policy or from other sources for losses sustained by the employment security administration fund or by reason of damage to equipment or supplies purchased from money in the fund; and proceeds realized from the sale or disposition of equipment or supplies which are no longer necessary for the administration of this chapter. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, all money requisitioned and deposited in this fund under AS

23.20.145(h)

shall remain part of the unemployment fund and shall be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in AS

23.20.145(f)

— (h).

All money in this fund shall be deposited, administered, and disbursed, in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements provided by law for other special funds in the state treasury.

The commissioner of revenue is liable on the official bond of the commissioner for the faithful performance of the commissioner’s duties in connection with the employment security administration fund. This liability on the official bond exists in addition to liabilities on a separate bond. Money recovered on a surety bond for losses sustained by the employment security administration fund shall be deposited in that fund.

History.

(§ 411 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am §§ 4, 5 ch 123 SLA 1968)

Sec. 23.20.160.
Reimbursement of fund.

If money received from the Department of Labor under 42 U.S.C. 501 — 504 (Title III, Social Security Act), or money granted to this state under the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended, or money made available by this state and matched by money granted to this state under the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended, is found by the Secretary of Labor, because of any action or contingency, to have been lost or expended for a purpose other than or in an amount in excess of that found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for the proper administration of this chapter, it is the policy of the state that the money shall be replaced by money appropriated for the purpose from the general fund of the state to the employment security administration fund for expenditures as provided for in AS

23.20.155

.
Upon receipt of notice of the finding by the Secretary of Labor, the department shall promptly report the amount required for replacement to the governor and the governor shall at the earliest opportunity submit to the legislature a request for the appropriation of the amount.

History.

(§ 412 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 6 ch 123 SLA 1968)

Cross references. —

For Wagner-Peyser Act, see the cross references at AS

23.20.005

.